Massachusetts, session 194th, H5052.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 12 of Chapter 686 of the Acts of 1970 is hereby amended by adding the
following new paragraph -
(h) The Town Meeting shall be accessible by those Town Meeting Members who wish to
attend, either in person or remotely via a video conferencing platform, with a maximum of
fifteen (15) members attending remotely. This communications platform will allow users to
connect using an internet connection and a supported device. Members of these meetings shall be
able to be recognized by the Moderator or Chair, and their vote, where applicable, be recorded
via the electronic communications platform.
of 1